trunk/kaynaklar/hunspell/turkish.aff
# Numbers. th  -ıncı -inci -uncu -üncü
# kırkıncı ellinci
SFX X1 N 10
SFX X1 0 nci [i]
SFX X1 0 ncı [ı]
SFX X1 0 inci [ei][^aeioöuü]
SFX X1 0 inci [ei][^aeioöuü][^aeioöuü]
SFX X1 0 üncü [öü][^aeioöuü]
SFX X1 0 üncü [öü][^aeioöuü][^aeioöuü]
SFX X1 0 ıncı [aı][^aeioöuü]
SFX X1 0 ıncı [aı][^aeioöuü][^aeioöuü]
SFX X1 0 uncu [ou][^aeioöuü]
SFX X1 0 uncu [ou][^aeioöuü][^aeioöuü]

# Numbers. to  -e -a -ye -ya
# ikiye dokuza
SFX X2 N 6
SFX X2 0 ye [eiöü]
SFX X2 0 ya [aıou]
SFX X2 0 e [eiöü][^aeioöuü]
SFX X2 0 e [eiöü][^aeioöuü][^aeioöuü]
SFX X2 0 a [aıou][^aeioöuü]
SFX X2 0 a [aıou][^aeioöuü][^aeioöuü]
